Illinois, session 104th, HB2801.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Career and technical education opportunity 8list. By July 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall 9provide a form, posted publicly on its website, for 10organizations to submit opportunities for high school students 11to participate in externships, internships, or volunteer work 12related to career and technical education career pathways. The 13opportunities submitted shall be reviewed and approved by the 14State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall 15post a list of approved opportunities on its website and share 16the list with all school districts annually.17    By July 1, 2027 and by July 1 each year thereafter, the 18State Board of Education shall compile and publish a report on 19its website listing the total number of organizations that 20submitted opportunities for high school students the previous 21year as provided in this Section. The report shall be 22disaggregated by the career areas under which each opportunity 23fell.